Massachusetts, session 194th, H4120.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
section 2JJJJJJ, the following section:-
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) For the purposes of section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Commissioner”, the commissioner of public health.
“Department”, the department of public health.
(b) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund known as the EMS Essential Service Fund, hereinafter referred to as the fund. The purpose
of the fund shall be to provide financial support for all types of emergency medical service
agencies in the commonwealth. The fund shall be administered by the commissioner.
of 4

(c) The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund;
(ii) interest earned on money in the fund; (iii) contributions from private sector entities,
including technology firms, foundations and other organizations; and (iv) federal grants and
other gifts, grants and donations for the support of emergency medical services. Amounts
credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any money remaining in the
fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
(d) The secretary shall make expenditures from the fund including, but not limited to, the
following purposes: (i) operational costs, including equipment, vehicles and personnel salaries;
(ii) training and certification programs for emergency medical service personnel; (iii)
investments in underserved or high-need areas to address disparities in service availability; and
(iv) incentives and technical assistance for emergency and medical service agencies that adopt
shared services models, including joint training programs and coordinated dispatch systems.
(e) All emergency medical service agencies receiving funding shall be subject to regular
audits to ensure compliance with state standards and effective use of resources.
(f) The department shall annually, not later than December 31, report on the activity of
the fund to the: (i) chairs of the joint committee on public health; (ii) chairs of the joint
committee on health care financing; (iii) chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and
means; and (iv) clerks of the house of representatives and senate.
SECTION 2. Chapter 111C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
of 4

Section 26. (a) For the purposes of section, the term “office” shall mean the office of
emergency medical services under the bureau of health care safety and quality within the
department.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be designated as an essential service in the
Commonwealth. Emergency medical service agencies shall be prioritized in state and local
planning, funding and resource allocation efforts to ensure adequate coverage and quality of care
in the commonwealth.
(c) The office shall develop and publish statewide standards to ensure consistent delivery
of high-quality emergency medical services. The standards shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
response time benchmarks tailored to urban, suburban and rural areas in the commonwealth; (ii)
training and certification requirements for emergency medical service personnel; and (iii)
guidelines for the equitable allocation of funding and resources.
(d) The office shall collaborate with regional and local emergency medical service
agencies to identify service gaps and implement measures to address disparities in emergency
medical service availability and quality.
(e) The office shall encourage and support regionalization efforts among emergency
medical service agencies to improve efficiency and resource utilization.
(f) The EMS Essential Service Fund established by section 2KKKKKK of chapter 29
shall provide funding for this section.
(g)(1) The office shall establish an advisory committee to guide emergency medical
services development and implementation in the commonwealth. The advisory committee shall
of 4

consist of: (i) the commissioner of the department or their designee; who shall be chair; (ii) 2
members appointed by the commissioner, who shall both be emergency medical service
professionals; (iii) 1 member appointed by the commissioner, who shall be a municipal
representative who specializes in emergency medical services; and (iv) 1 member appointed by
the commissioner, who shall be an expert in public health.
(2) The advisory committee shall meet at least quarterly to review progress and
recommend strategies for improving emergency medical services in the commonwealth.
(h) All emergency medical service agencies receiving funding shall be subject to regular
audits to ensure compliance with state standards and effective use of resources.
(i) The office, in consultation with the department, shall prepare an annual report that
shall include: (i) the status of emergency medical services, including funding needs and
workforce challenges; (ii) an evaluation of the effectiveness in improving access to emergency
medical service care; (iii) analysis of cost savings and financial sustainability; (iv) collected data
from emergency medical service agencies; and (v) any recommendations for expansion of
emergency medical services. The annual report shall be submitted, not later than December 31 of
each year, to the governor, the chairs of the joint committee on public health, the chairs of the
joint committee on health care financing and the clerks of the house of representatives and
senate.
of 4